Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SCR1048.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona:
<<Section 1. Section 12-991, Arizona Revised Statutes,
is amended to read:
12-991. Nuisance; applicability; residential property
used for crime; action to abate and prevent;
notice; definitions
A. Residential property that is regularly used in the
commission of a crime is a nuisance, and the criminal activity
causing the nuisance shall be enjoined, abated and prevented.

Senate Amendments to S.C.R. 1048
B. If there is reason to believe that a nuisance as
described in subsection A of this section exists, the attorney
general, the county attorney, the city attorney, an
association of homeowners or property owners established by a
recorded contract or other declaration, including a
condominium association as defined in section 33-1202 and a
planned community association as defined in section 33-1802,
or a resident of a county or city who is affected by the
nuisance may bring an action in superior court against the
owner, the owner's managing agent or any other party
responsible for the property to abate and prevent the criminal
activity.
C. The court shall not assess a civil penalty against
any person unless that person knew or had reason to know of
the criminal activity.
D. An injunction that is ordered pursuant to this
article shall be necessary to protect the health and safety of
the public or prevent further criminal activity.
E. An order shall not affect the owner's interest in
the property unless all of the following apply:
1. The owner is a defendant in the action.
2. The owner knew of the criminal activity.
3. The owner failed to take reasonable, legally
available actions to abate the nuisance.
F. If the owner, the owner's managing agent or the
party responsible for the property knows or has reason to know
of the criminal activity and fails to take reasonable, legally
available actions to abate the nuisance, a governmental
authority may abate the nuisance. The court may assess the
owner for the cost of abating the nuisance. On recording with
the county recorder in the county in which the property is
located, the assessment is prior to all other liens,
obligations or encumbrances except for prior recorded
mortgages, restitution liens, child support liens and general
tax liens. A city, town or county may bring an action to
enforce the assessment in the superior court in the county in
which the property is located.
G. For purposes of this section, an owner, the owner's
managing agent or the party responsible for the property is
deemed to know or have reason to know of the nuisance if the
owner, the owner's managing agent or the party responsible for
the property has received notice from a governmental authority
of documented reports of criminal offenses occurring on the
residential property.
H. A law enforcement agency, a city attorney, a county
attorney, the attorney general or any other person who is at
least twenty-one years of age may serve the notice provided
for in subsection G of this section, either personally or by
certified mail. If personal service or service by certified
-2-

Senate Amendments to S.C.R. 1048
mail cannot be completed or the address of the person to be
notified is unknown, notice may be served by publishing the
notice three times within ten consecutive days in a newspaper
of general circulation in the county in which the property is
located. In all cases a copy of the notice shall be posted on
the premises where the nuisance exists.
I. The notice shall be printed in at least twelve-point
type in substantially the following form:
Notice
This is formal notice that the property at (insert
address and unit number if applicable) has had (insert number
of) arrests or (insert number of) documented reports of
alleged criminal activity and is considered a nuisance under
section 12-991, Arizona Revised Statutes. A copy of the
police report numbers is attached. Police reports are
available at (insert applicable police agency).
Within five business days you must begin to take action
that is legally available to you to abate the nuisance from
the property. If you fail to do so, a restraining order to
abate and prevent continuing or recurring criminal activity
will be pursued.
If you fail to cooperate to abate the nuisance, the
appropriate authorities will abate the nuisance and their
costs will be a lien on the property.
You may contact (local agency) in order to obtain
information on how to abate the nuisance.
J. For the purposes of this article:
1. "CRIME" INCLUDES THE CREATION OF EXCESSIVE MARIJUANA
SMOKE AND ODOR.
1. 2. "Owner" means a person or persons or a legal
entity listed as the current title holder as recorded in the
official records of the county recorder in the county in which
the title is recorded.
2. 3. "Owner's managing agent" means a person,
corporation, partnership or limited liability company that is
authorized by the owner to operate and manage the property. >>
≤≤<<Section 1. Section 13-2901, Arizona Revised Statutes, is
amended to read:
13-2901. Definitions
In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. ["EXCESSIVE MARIJUANA SMOKE OR ODOR" MEANS MARIJUANA SMOKE
OR ODOR THAT IS CAPABLE OF BEING DETECTED BY A PERSON ON THE PRIVATE
PROPERTY OF ANOTHER PERSON.
2.] "Marijuana"[:
(a)] Means all parts of any plant of the genus cannabis[, ]
from which the resin has not been extracted, whether growing or not,
and the seeds of such [A] plant. [Marijuana]
-3-

Senate Amendments to S.C.R. 1048
[(b)] Does not include the mature stalks of such [A]
plant[, ] or the sterilized seed of such [A] plant [which] [THAT] is
incapable of germination.
[2.] [3.] "Public" means affecting or likely to affect a
substantial group of persons.>>≥≥
≤≤Sec. 2. Section 13-2908, Arizona Revised Statutes, is
amended to read:
13-2908. Criminal nuisance; presumption; classification
A. A person commits criminal nuisance:
1. If, by conduct either unlawful in itself or
unreasonable under the circumstances, such THE person
recklessly creates or maintains a condition which THAT
endangers the safety or health of others.
2. By knowingly conducting or maintaining any premises,
place or resort where persons gather for purposes of engaging
in unlawful conduct.
B. IT IS PRESUMED THAT A PERSON WHO CREATES EXCESSIVE
MARIJUANA SMOKE [AND] [OR] ODOR CAUSES A CONDITION THAT
ENDANGERS THE SAFETY OR HEALTH OF OTHERS.
B. C. Criminal nuisance is a class 3 misdemeanor.≥≥
≤≤Section 1. Title 12, chapter 7, article 12, Arizona Revised
Statutes, is amended by adding section 12-991.01, to read:
12-991.01. Excessive marijuana odor; interference; nuisance;
failure to comply; violation; classification; definition
{{A. EXCESSIVE MARIJUANA SMOKE OR ODOR THAT CROSSES A
PROPERTY BOUNDARY AND SUBSTANTIALLY AND UNREASONABLY INTERFERES WITH
THE USE AND ENJOYMENT OF NEARBY PRIVATE PROPERTY CONSTITUTES A
PRIVATE NUISANCE. LAWFUL POSSESSION OR USE OF MARIJUANA DOES NOT
PRECLUDE A FINDING OF NUISANCE UNDER THIS SECTION, EXCEPT THAT A
COURT MAY CONSIDER AS A MITIGATING FACTOR POSSESSION OF A VALID
MARIJUANA REGISTRY IDENTIFICATION CARD AS DEFINED IN SECTION
36-2801.
B. A PERSON IS NOT LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION UNLESS THE
PERSON HAS RECEIVED NOTICE OF THE INTERFERENCE AND FAILS TO ABATE IT
WITHIN FIVE DAYS.
C. AN AFFECTED PROPERTY OWNER OR RESIDENT MAY SEEK INJUNCTIVE
RELIEF, COMPENSATORY DAMAGES FOR LOSS OF USE AND ENJOYMENT, COSTS
AND REASONABLE ATTORNEY FEES AND OTHER EQUITABLE RELIEF THE COURT
DEEMS APPROPRIATE.
D. THIS SECTION DOES NOT PREEMPT A LOCAL ORDINANCE THAT IS
MORE PROTECTIVE OF PRIVATE PROPERTY RIGHTS. IF A CITY, TOWN OR
COUNTY HAS ADOPTED AN ORDINANCE REGULATING EXCESSIVE MARIJUANA SMOKE
OR ODOR, AN AFFECTED PROPERTY OWNER OR RESIDENT SHALL FIRST FILE A
COMPLAINT WITH THE LOCAL JURISDICTION BEFORE FILING AN ACTION UNDER
THIS SECTION. IF THE LOCAL JURISDICTION DECLINES TO ACT OR DOES NOT
TAKE FINAL ACTION WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE COMPLAINT IS FILED,
THE AFFECTED PROPERTY OWNER OR RESIDENT MAY BRING AN ACTION IN
JUSTICE COURT. THIS SECTION DOES NOT PRECLUDE A HOMEOWNERS'
-4-

Senate Amendments to S.C.R. 1048
ASSOCIATION OR CONDOMINIUM ASSOCIATION FROM TAKING ACTION AGAINST A
PROPERTY OWNER.
E. A PERSON COMMITS FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH A MARIJUANA SMOKE
NUISANCE ABATEMENT ORDER IF BOTH OF THE FOLLOWING EXIST:
1. A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION OR A CITY, TOWN OR
COUNTY ACTING UNDER LAWFUL AUTHORITY HAS ISSUED A WRITTEN ORDER
DIRECTING THE PERSON TO ABATE EXCESSIVE MARIJUANA SMOKE OR ODOR THAT
CONSTITUTES A NUISANCE PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION OR AN APPLICABLE
LOCAL ORDINANCE.
2. THE PERSON KNOWINGLY VIOLATES OR REFUSES TO COMPLY WITH
THE ORDER IS SERVED.
F. EACH DAY A VIOLATION CONTINUES AFTER THE ORDER CONSTITUTES
A SEPARATE OFFENSE.
G. FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH A MARIJUANA SMOKE NUISANCE
ABATEMENT ORDER IS A PETTY OFFENSE.
H. FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, "EXCESSIVE MARIJUANA
SMOKE OR ODOR" MEANS AIRBORNE EMISSIONS RESULTING FROM THE BURNING,
HEATING OR VAPORIZING OF MARIJUANA OR MARIJUANA PRODUCTS THAT BOTH:
1. ARE DETECTABLE BY A REASONABLE PERSON OF ORDINARY
SENSIBILITIES ON OTHER PRIVATE PROPERTY.
2. OCCUR FOR MORE THAN THIRTY CONSECUTIVE MINUTES ON A SINGLE
OCCASION OR ON THREE OR MORE SEPARATE DAYS WITHIN A THIRTY-DAY
PERIOD.}}≥≥
Sec. 2. Section 13-2917, Arizona Revised Statutes, is
amended to read:
13-2917. Public nuisance; abatement; presumption;
classification
A. It is a public nuisance, and is no less a nuisance
because the extent of the annoyance or damage inflicted is
unequal, for anything:
1. To be injurious to health, indecent, offensive to
the senses or an obstruction to the free use of property that
interferes with the comfortable enjoyment of life or property
by an entire community or neighborhood or by a considerable
number of persons.
2. To unlawfully obstruct the free passage or use, in
the customary manner, of any navigable lake, river, bay,
stream, canal or basin, or any public park, square, street or
highway.
B. It is a public nuisance for any person to sell,
offer to sell, transfer, trade or disseminate any OBSCENE item
which is obscene as defined in section 13-3501, within two
thousand feet, measured in a straight line, of the nearest
boundary line of any of the following:
1. Any building used as a private or public elementary
or high school.
2. Any public park.
3. Any residence district as defined in section 28-101.
-5-

Senate Amendments to S.C.R. 1048
C. The county attorney, the attorney general or the
city attorney may bring an action in superior court to abate,
enjoin and prevent the activity described in subsections A and
B of this section.
D. {{IT IS PRESUMED THAT THE CREATION OF}} EXCESSIVE
MARIJUANA SMOKE [AND] [OR] ODOR {{PURSUANT TO SECTION
12-991.01}} IS {{INJURIOUS TO HEALTH, INDECENT, OFFENSIVE TO
THE SENSES AND AN OBSTRUCTION TO THE FREE USE OF PROPERTY
THAT}} {{A PUBLIC NUISANCE IF THE PERSON'S CONDUCT IS
INTENTIONAL OR THE PERSON KNOWINGLY AND
SUBSTANTIALLY}} INTERFERES WITH THE COMFORTABLE ENJOYMENT OF
LIFE OR PROPERTY {{AND IS A PUBLIC NUISANCE}}.
D. E. Any person who knowingly maintains or commits a
public nuisance or who knowingly fails or refuses to perform
any legal duty relating to the removal of a public nuisance is
guilty of a class 2 misdemeanor.
2. The Secretary of State shall submit this proposition to the
voters at the next general election as provided by article IV, part 1,
section 1, Constitution of Arizona.
Enroll and engross to conform
Amend title to conform
J.D. MESNARD
SCR1048FloorMESNARD.docx
02/25/2026
06:28 PM
C: JV
130ULYEYW
-6-